src/morphology/affixes/possessive-suffixes.lexc
LEXICON NES_Px
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1:ass%>eme                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2:ass%>edh                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3:ass%>se                   FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1:ass%>eme                  FINAL1   ;
 +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>emem                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:ass%>emdh                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:asse%>mse                 FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1:ass%>ene                  FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:ass%>esanne               FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:ass%>esadth               FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1:ass%>estanne              FINAL1   ;
 +N+Sg+Ela+PxSg1+Use/NG:ass%>estadth              FINAL1   ;
        +N+Sg+Com+PxSg2:ass%>enadth               FINAL1   ;


LEXICON GÅATETJEadj_Px
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>amme          FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>adth          FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Acc+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>amth          FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Err/Orth:%>anne          FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>anne          FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Err/Orth:%>anne          FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Ill+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>assedh        FINAL1    ;
 +Sg+Com+PxSg2+Err/Orth:%>æjnedh        FINAL1    ;
 
 

!! !!Px lexica     = Copy from Julev
!LEXICON NPxV_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxV ;
!LEXICON NPxV-12_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxV-12 ;
!LEXICON NPxV3_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxV3 ;
!LEXICON NPxNomPlV_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxNomPlV ;
!LEXICON NPxCi_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxCi ;
!LEXICON NPxC_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxC ;
!LEXICON NPxCs_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxCs ;
!LEXICON NPxCc_Px
! @R.Px.add@ PxCc ;
